src-fst-morphology-affixes-prefixes.lexc.md
Prefixes
Prefixes in the Southern Puget Sound Salish language are attached to the beginning of other words.
1994
gʷə- [variant of gʷ- occurring before consonants]
gʷədɬ- [Steller's lay's rendering of gʷ-d-s-]
ʔəsgʷə- [composed of prefixes {ʔØ}{əa}s<gʷ«]
ʔugʷə- [composed of prefixes ʔu<gʷ«]
ʔəxʷ- [composed of prefixes {ʔØ}{əa}s<dxʷ«]
ʔudxʷ- [composed of prefixes ʔu<dxʷ«]
ʔiɬu- [composed of prefixes ʔiɬ-u-]
ʔudəxʷ- [composed of prefixes ʔu-dəxʷ-]
ad(d)əxʷ- [composed of prefixes ad-dəxʷ-]
ad(d)əxʷu- [composed of prefixes ad<dəxʷ<u-]
adəs- [composed of prefixes ad<{ʔØ}{əa}s<]
bəʔiɬ- [composed of prefixes bə-ʔiɬ-]
b(ə)as- [composed of prefixes bə-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
b(ə)asdxʷ- [composed of prefixes bə-{ʔØ}{əa}s-dxʷ-]
bədəxʷ- [composed of prefixes bə<dəxʷ-]
bədxʷ- [composed of prefixes bə<dxʷ-]
bəgʷə- [composed of prefixes bə<gʷ-]
bələ- [composed of prefixes bə<lə<]
bələcu- [composed of prefixes bə<ləcu<]
bələdxʷ- [composed of prefixes bə-lə-dxʷ-]
b(ə)u- [composed of prefixes bə<u-]
cəxʷ- __ that is how I, that is where I, that is when I; why I [composed of prefixes d-dəxʷ-]
cəxʷə- [composed of prefixes d-dəxʷ-lə]
cəxʷəs- [composed of prefixes d-dəxʷ-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
cəxʷu- [composed of prefixes d-dəxʷ-u-]
dəxʷə- [composed of prefixes dəxʷ-lə-]
dəxʷəs- [composed of prefixes dəxʷ-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
dəxʷtul̕- [composed of prefixes dəxʷ-tul̕-]
dəxʷu- [composed of prefixes dəxʷ-u-]
gʷad(d)əxʷəs- [composed of prefixes gʷ-ad-dəxʷ-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
gʷəbə- [composed of prefixes gʷ-bə-]
gʷəbələ- [composed of prefixes gʷ-bə-lə-]
gʷəcəxʷ- [composed of prefixes gʷ-cəxʷ]
gʷəd- [composed of prefixes gʷ-d-]
gʷədəxʷ- [composed of prefixes gʷ-dəxʷ-]
gʷədəxʷəs- [composed of prefixes gʷ-dəxʷ-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
gʷədəxʷu- [composed of prefixes gʷ-dəxʷ-u]
gʷədxʷ- [composed of prefixes gʷ-dxʷ-]
gʷələ- [composed of prefixes gʷ-lə-]
gʷələcu- [composed of prefixes gʷ-ləcu-]
gʷələdxʷ- [composed of prefixes gʷ-lə-dxʷ]
gʷəƛ̕u- [composed of prefixes gʷ-ƛ̕u-]
gʷəƛ̕(u)as- [composed of prefixes gʷ-ƛ̕u-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
gʷəs- [composed of prefixes gʷ-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
gʷətu- [composed of prefixes gʷ<tu<]
gʷətul̕- [composed of prefixes gʷ-tul̕-]
gʷəxʷ- [composed of prefixes gʷ<{ʔØ}{əa}s<dxʷ-]
gʷəxʷ [composed of prefixes gʷ<xʷ-]
gʷu- [composed of prefixes gʷ<u-]
ləbə- [composed of prefixes lə<bə-]
lədxʷ- [composed of prefixes lə<dxʷ-]
ləgʷə- [composed of prefixes lə<gʷ«]
ləgʷədəxʷu- [composed of prefixes lə-gʷ-dəxʷ-u-]
lələcu- [composed of prefixes lə²<ləcu<]
ɬəbə- [composed of prefixes ɬu<bə-]
ɬəbələ- [composed of prefixes ɬu<bə-lə-]
ɬədəxʷ- [composed of prefixes ɬu<dəxʷ<0<]
ɬədəxʷəs- [composed of prefixes ɬu<dəxʷ<{ʔØ}{əa}s<]
ɬədəxʷu- [composed of prefixes ɬu<dəxʷ<u<]
ɬədsə- [composed of prefixes ɬu<d<s-lə-]
ɬulə- [composed of prefixes ɬu<lə-]
ɬələ- [composed of prefixes ɬu<lə-]
ɬu-ʔiɬ- [composed of prefixes ɬu<ʔiɬ-]
ɬuʔiɬlə- [composed of prefixes ɬu<ʔiɬ-lə-]
ɬ(u)ab- [composed of prefixes ɬu-ab-]
ɬ(u)ad(d)əxʷ- [composed of prefixes ɬu-ad-dəxʷ-,
ɬ(u)ad(d)əxʷu- [composed of prefixes ɬu-ad-dəxʷ-u-]
ɬ(u)adsixʷ- [composed of prefixes ɬu-ad-sixʷ-
ɬ(u)as- [composed of prefixes ɬu-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
ɬ(u)u- [composed of prefixes ɬu<u<]
ɬuləcu- [composed of prefixes ɬu-ləcu-]
ɬubə- [composed of prefixes ɬu-bə-]
ɬubəcəxʷ- [composed of prefixes ɬu-bə-d-dəxʷ-]
ɬubələ- [composed of prefixes ɬu-bə-lə-]
ɬudəxʷ- [composed of prefixes ɬu-dəxʷ-)
ɬudəxʷu- [composed of prefixes ɬu-dəxʷ-u-]
ɬudxʷ- [composed of prefixes ɬu-dxʷ-]
ƛ̕əbə- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u-bə-]
ƛ̕əbədəxʷu- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u-bə-dəxʷ-u-]
ƛ̕əbəliɬ- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u-bə-liɬ-]
ƛ̕əcəxʷə(s)- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u-d-dəxʷ-{ʔØ}{əa}s-.
ƛ̕ədəxʷ- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u-dəxʷ-]
ƛ̕ədəxʷə- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u-dəxʷ-lə-]
ƛ̕ədəxʷəs- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u-dəxʷ-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
ƛ̕ədəxʷu- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u-dəxʷ-u-)
ƛ̕ələ- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕ulə-]
ƛ̕(u)as- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
ƛ̕udəxʷ [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u-dəxʷ]
ƛ̕udxʷ- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u-dxʷ-]
ƛ̕udxʷʔi- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u-dxʷ-ʔi-l (ʔi is an unknown element-SSP8.025)
ƛ̕(u)u- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u-u-]
ƛ̕uxʷ- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u-xʷ-]
sixʷu- [composed of prefixes sixʷ-u-]
təbə- [composed of prefixes tu-bə-]
təbəliɬ- [composed of prefixes tu-bə-liɬ-]
təcəxʷə- [composed of prefixes tu-d-dəxʷ-lə-]
təcəxʷu- [composed of prefixes tu-d-dəxʷ-u-]
tədəxʷ- [composed of prefixes tu-dəxʷ-]
tədəxʷəs- [composed of prefixes tu-dəxʷ-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
tədəxʷtul̕- [composed of prefixes tu-dəxʷ-tul̕-]
tədəxʷu- [composed of prefixes tu-dəxʷ-u-]
təl(ə)abxʷ- [composed of prefixes tu-lə-ab-xʷ-]
tələdxʷu- [composed of prefixes tu-lə-dxʷ-u-]
tələs- [composed of prefixes tu-ləs-]
təsəxʷ- [composed of prefixes tu-səxʷ-]
t(u)abs- [composed of prefixes tu-abs-]
t(u)as- [composed of prefixes tu-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
tubədəxʷ- [composed of prefixes tu-bə-dəxʷ-]
tud-² [composed of prefixes tu-d-]
tudxʷ- [composed of prefixes tu-dxʷ.
tugʷə- [composed of prefixes tu-gʷə-]
tulə- [composed of prefixes tu-lə]
tuliɬ- [composed of prefixes tu-liɬ-]
tuxʷ- [composed of prefixes tu-dxʷ-]

ʔəxʷs- [composed of prefixes {ʔØ}{əa}s-dxʷ-s]
ʔiɬ(ʔə)xʷs- [composed of prefixes ʔiɬ-{ʔØ}{əa}s-dxʷ-s-]
ʔudxʷs- [composed of prefixes ʔu-dxʷ-s-]

ads- [composed of prefixes ad-s-]
adsəs- [composed of prefixes ad-s-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
b(ə)ads- [composed of prefixes bə-ad-s-u-]
b(ə)adsu- [composed of prefixes bə-ad-s-u-]
ds- [composed of prefixes d<s-]
dsʔiɬ- [composed of prefixes d-s-ʔiɬ-]
ds(ʔ)iɬə- [composed of prefixes d-s-ʔiɬ-lə-]
dsə- [composed of prefixes d<s-ə-¹]
dsəs- [composed of prefixes d<s-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
gʷads- [composed of prefixes gʷ<ad<s-]
gʷadsəs- [composed of prefixes gʷ<ad<s-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
gʷəds- [composed of prefixes gʷ<d<s-]
gʷədsə- [composed of prefixes gʷ<d<s-lə-]
gʷədsəs- [composed of prefixes gʷ<d<s-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
gʷədsu- [composed of prefixes gʷ<d<s-u-]
gʷəɬ(u)ads- [composed of prefixes gʷ<ɬu<ad<s-]
ɬ(u)ads- [composed of prefixes ɬu<ad<s-]
ɬ(u)adsdxʷ- [composed of prefixes ɬu<ad<s-dxʷ-]
ɬ(u)adsəs- [composed of prefixes ɬu<ad<s-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
ɬ(u)adsu- [composed of prefixes ɬu<ad<s-u-]
ɬuds- [composed of prefixes ɬu<d<s-]
ɬudsgʷə- [composed of prefixes ɬu<d<s-gʷ-]
ɬudsu- [composed of prefixes ɬu<d<s-u-]
tədsəs- [composed of prefixes tu<d<s-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
t(u)ads- [composed of prefixes tu<ad<s-]
tuds- [composed of prefixes tu<d<s-]
t(u)adsəs- [composed of prefixes tu<ad<s-{ʔØ}{əa}s-
tudsəs- [composed of prefixes tu<d<s-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
Ø/gʷə/tu/ɬu/bə %< ad/d %< s %< gʷ/u/əs

bələs- [composed of prefixes bə-ləs-]
bəs-² [composed of prefixes bə-s-]
bəsu- [composed of prefixes bə-s-u-]
dəxʷbəs- [composed of prefixes dəxʷ-bə-s]
dəxʷs- [composed of prefixes dəxʷ-s-]
gʷəbəs- [composed of prefixes gʷ-bə-s-]
gʷəbəsu- [composed of prefixes gʷ-bə-s-u-]
gʷəƛ̕əsəs- [composed of prefixes gʷ-ƛ̕u-s-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
gʷəƛ̕us- [composed of prefixes gʷ-ƛ̕u-s-]
gʷəƛ̕usu- [composed of prefixes gʷ-ƛ̕u-s-u]
gʷəsuxʷ- [composed of prefixes gʷ-s-u-xʷ-.]
gʷətus- [composed of prefixes gʷ-tu-s-]
gʷət(u)sə- [composed of prefixes gʷ-t(u)-s-lə],
gʷət(u)su- [composed of prefixes gʷ-tu-s-u-]
lədxʷs- [composed of prefixes lə-dxʷ-s-)
ɬəsəs- [composed of prefixes ɬu-s-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
ɬusəs- [composed of prefixes ɬu-s-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
ɬəsu- [composed of prefixes ɬu-s-u]
ɬudxʷs- [composed of prefixes ɬu-dxʷ-s-)]
ɬus- [composed of prefixes ɬu-s-]
ɬusʔiɬ- [composed of prefixes ɬu-s-ʔiɬ-)
ɬusgʷə- [composed of prefixes ɬu-s-gʷ-]
ƛ̕əbəsʔiɬ- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u-bə-s-ʔiɬ-]
ƛ̕əbəsəs- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u-bə-s-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
ƛ̕ələʔəxʷs- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u-lə-{ʔØ}{əa}s-dxʷ-s-]
ƛ̕əsə- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u<s-lə-]
ƛ̕əsəs- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u<s-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
ƛ̕əsiɬu- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u<s-ʔiɬ-u-)
ƛ̕əsu- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u<s-u-]
ƛ̕us- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u<s-]
ƛ̕usʔiɬu- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u<s-ʔiɬ-u]
ƛ̕usgʷə- [composed of prefixes ƛ̕u<s-gʷ-]
sʔiɬu- [composed of prefixes s-ʔiɬ-u-]
sdxʷ [composed of prefixes s-dxʷ-]
sə- [composed of prefixes s-ə-]
səxʷs- [composed of prefixes səxʷ-s-)
sixʷs- [composed of prefixes sixʷ-s-]
su- [composed of prefixes s-u-]
təbəs- [composed of prefixes tu-bə-s-]
təbəsəs- [composed of prefixes tu-bə-s-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
tus- [composed of prefixes tu<s-]
təsə- [composed of prefixes tu<s-lə-]
təsu- [composed of prefixes tu<s-u-]
təsəs- [composed of prefixes tu<s-{ʔØ}{əa}s-]
təsgʷə- [composed of prefixes tu<s-gʷ«)

Beck, David 2018: Aspectual Affixation in Lushootseed: A minor reanalysis
ordering
Tense/mood | Poss.subj | nominalizers | Aspect | Stem | Object/voice | others
gʷə%<, ƛ̕u%<, tu%<, ɬu%<, bə%< | d%<, ad%< |s%<, dəxʷ%< | ʔu, ʔəs, lə, ləs, ləcu| X |%>s/%>bš, %>sut/%>ut, %>agʷəl, %>b |%>ləp, %>s, %>əxʷ

-1/-4?(lə=bə=ʔas-q̓ʷəl-il) proclitic Asp/Prog+:lə%<
@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@:@U.TAM-HAB.HAB@ƛ̕u%<  (+Hab)
@U.TAM-T.REM@:@U.TAM-T.REM@tu%<   (TM/Past+)
@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@:@U.TAM-HAB.IRR@ɬu%<  (+Fut)
@U.TAM-RE.RE@:@U.TAM-RE.RE@bə%<  (+Add)
-1 aspect
@U.TAM-A.PROG@:@U.TAM-A.PROG@lə%<  (non-circumscribed, progressive)
@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ʔəs%<  (ongoing state: Asp/Stat)
@U.TAM-A.STAT@:@U.TAM-A.STAT@ʔas%<  (ongoing state: Asp/Stat)variant
@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@:@U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@ləs%< (Asp/ProgStat)
@U.TAM-A.PFV@:@U.TAM-A.PFV@ʔu%<  (Asp/Pfv)
-1 Asp/Cont+:ləcu%< (?Asp/Prog+:lə%< + Asp/Pfv+:ʔu%<) Skagit
-1 Asp/Stat:ʔə{sØ}{dØ}xʷ%< (Asp/Stat+:ʔəs%< + dxʷ%<)

X
1 %>s/%>bš, %>sut/%>ut, %>agʷəl, %>b, +Inch:%>il
2 %>ləp, +Px3:%>s, %>əxʷ
lə<bə<ləcu<gʷaadgʷad

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/affixes/prefixes.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-slh/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/affixes/prefixes.lexc)</small>
